District of Columbia statutes.
31-3171.09b

Sale, solicitation, and negotiation by insurance producers.

(a)

An insurance producer that is licensed in the District and authorized by the Commissioner to sell, solicit, or negotiate health insurance pursuant to Chapter 11A of Title 31 [§ 31-1131.02 et seq.], may sell any qualified health plan offered in the American Health Benefit Exchange, after satisfactorily completing training developed and provided by the Authority.

(b)

An insurance producer shall be compensated directly by a health carrier for the sale of a qualified health plan offered in the American Health Benefit Exchange.

History

March 2, 2012, D.C. Law 19-94, § 10b
as added July 16, 2014, D.C. Law 20-123, § 2(c), 61 DCR 5379

Temporary Legislation

For temporary (225 days) addition of D.C. Law 19-94, § 10b, concerning sale, solicitation, and negotiation by insurance producers, see § 2(c) of the Better Prices, Better Quality, Better Choices for Health Coverage Temporary Amendment Act of 2013 (D.C. Law 20-22, October 3, 2013, 60 DCR 10880).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 days) addition of D.C. Law 19-94, § 10b, concerning sale, solicitation, and negotiation by insurance producers, see § 2(c) of the Better Prices, Better Quality, Better Choices for Health Coverage Emergency Amendment Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-87, June 19, 2013, 60 DCR 9542, 20 DCSTAT 1446).
For temporary (90 days) addition of section, see §§ 2(a) and 3 of the Better Prices, Better Quality, Better Choices for Health Coverage Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-170, September 26, 2013, 60 DCR 14742).
For temporary (90 days) addition of section, see § 2(c) of the Better Prices, Better Quality, Better Choices for Health Coverage Emergency Amendment Act of 2014, (D.C. Act 20-335, May 22, 2014, 61 DCR 5375).